Oklahoma, session 2025, SB473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2014 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For entities obtaining funding pursuant to subsection G of
Section 2003 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes and subsections A
and B of Section 2007 of Title 62 the Oklahoma Statutes, each entity
shall develop a plan to measure the qualitative effects of projects
funded through the Rural Economic Action Plan of 1996. The plan may
utilize inquiries or surveys of the public, local governments, or
municipalities to measure the effects.
B. On or before January 1, 2028, each entity required to
develop a plan pursuant to subsection A of this section shall submit
a report to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce detailing the
qualitative effects of at least two projects that received funds
pursuant to the Rural Economic Action Plan of 1996.

C. Any expenditures associated with creating the plan required
by subsection A of this section and the report required by
subsection B of this section shall be made using the initial
planning expenditure payments authorized pursuant to subsection C of
Section 2011 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 473 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 473 Page 3